Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Child Support Recovery
205.769.
Federal and state income tax refund offsets.

In cases deemed appropriate pursuant to established guidelines, the cabinet shall refer for federal income tax refund offset and state income tax refund offset verified amounts which are owed for overdue child support and maintenance amounts that are included in the same support order as child support. The cabinet shall refer for federal income tax refund offset and state income tax refund offset verified amounts which are owed for medical support, when the medical support arrearage accrued is based on a medical support order for a specified dollar amount.

In nonpublic assistance cases, the custodial parent shall be notified in advance if any offset amount will be first used to satisfy any unreimbursed public assistance payments which have been provided to the family.

Written notice in advance shall be provided the obligor of the referral for state income tax refund offset, together with the opportunity to contest the referral pursuant to procedures which are in compliance with the state’s procedural due process requirements.

If the offset amount is found to be in error or to exceed the amount of overdue support, the cabinet shall promptly refund the excess amount pursuant to established procedures.

The cabinet may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of collecting overdue support using the state tax refund offset.

The Department of Revenue shall notify the cabinet of the parent’s home address and Social Security number or numbers. The cabinet shall provide this information to any other state involved in enforcing the support order.

The cabinet has the unfettered right to intercept federal income tax refunds and state income tax refunds, pursuant to 45 C.F.R. 303.72 and KRS 131.560 to 131.595, to satisfy all child support, maintenance, and medical support arrearages due the cabinet or its assignee.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 487, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 330, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 621, effective June 20, 2005.

205.7695.
Sharing of state tax information for child support collection.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Department of Revenue shall work together to develop a system of information sharing for the effective and efficient collection of child support payments. Any requirement included in KRS Chapter 131, 205, 403, or 405 or any other law for either the cabinet or the department for the confidentiality of individual personal and financial records shall not be violated in the process of this coordination.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 622, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 268, effective June 20, 2005.

205.770.
Child custody and visitation rights.

If a child is receiving services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act and the cabinet has taken action under the provisions of KRS 205.715 to 205.800, 403.215, 405.405 to 405.530 and 530.050 to obtain support on behalf of the child, matters concerning custody of the child and visitation rights of the parents shall not be used by either parent as a reason not to pay child support to the cabinet.

Upon a determination by the cabinet that such would be in the best interest of the child, the cabinet may petition a Circuit Court of proper jurisdiction in the name of the child to make a determination of child custody and visitation rights of a parent.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 14; 1988, ch. 411, § 13, effective July 15, 1988.

205.772.
Data match agreements between cabinet and financial institutions — Surrender of assets when parent is subject to lien — Fee — Financial institutions not liable.

Financial institutions doing business in the Commonwealth shall enter into cooperative agreements with the cabinet or its designee to operate a data match system. Pursuant to the agreements, the financial institution shall be required to provide identifying information each calendar quarter for each obligated parent who maintains an account at the institution and who owes an arrearage, and who shall be identified by the cabinet.

The cooperative agreement shall include provisions for financial institutions to encumber or surrender assets held by the institutions on behalf of any obligated parent who is subject to a child support lien pursuant to KRS 205.778.

The financial institution shall be paid a fee for conducting data matches from the obligor’s account, not to exceed the actual cost.

No liability shall arise for the Commonwealth or the financial institution under this section with respect to any disclosure of financial records for the establishment, modification, or enforcement of a child support obligation of the individual.

The financial institution shall not be liable for encumbering or surrendering any assets held by such financial institution in response to a notice of lien or levy issued by the cabinet, for any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirement of this section.

“Financial institution” means:

A depository institution and an institution-affiliated party as defined by 12 U.S.C. sec. 1813(c) and (u);

Any federal or state credit union, including an institution-affiliated party of that credit union, as defined by 12 U.S.C. sec. 1752 and 12 U.S.C. sec. 1786(r);

Any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money market mutual fund, brokerage firm, trust company, or similar entity authorized to do business in the Commonwealth.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the requirements of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 42, effective July 15, 1998.

205.774.
Wage reporting and financial institution match systems — Agreements.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall design, develop, implement, and operate a wage reporting and financial institution match system for the purpose of identifying the financial assets of individuals as identified by cabinet agencies, for the purpose of administering the child support enforcement program of the Commonwealth. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services may promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section.

Each financial institution in the Commonwealth shall enter into an agreement with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to develop and operate a data match system to facilitate identification of financial assets of individuals identified by cabinet agencies for the purpose of administering the child support enforcement programs of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 43, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 269, effective June 20, 2005.

205.775.
Reimbursement of support payments. [Repealed.]

205.776.
Disclosure of information about data match system to depositors — Penalty — Liability of financial institution — Fee.

A financial institution furnishing a report or providing asset information of an individual owing past-due support to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under either subsection (1) or subsection (2) of KRS 205.774 shall not disclose to a depositor or an account holder that the name of that person has been received from or furnished to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. An institution may disclose to its depositors or account holder that under the financial institution match system the Cabinet for Health and Family Services has the authority to request certain identifying information on certain depositors or account holders.

If a financial institution willfully violates the provisions of this section by releasing asset information of an individual owing child support to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the institution shall pay to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services the lesser of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or the amount on deposit or in the account of the person to whom the disclosure was made.

A financial institution shall incur no obligation or liability to a depositor or account holder or any other person arising from the furnishing of a report or information to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS 205.774, or from the failure to disclose to a depositor or account holder that the name of the person was included in a list furnished by the financial institution to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or in a report furnished by the financial institution to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

Regardless of whether the action was specifically authorized or described in KRS 205.715 to 205.800 or an agreement, a financial institution shall not be liable for providing or disclosing of any information; for encumbering, holding, refusing to release, surrendering, or transferring any account balance or asset; or any other action taken by a financial institution pursuant to KRS 205.715 to 205.800 or agreement as required by KRS 205.774.

A financial institution shall not give notice to an account holder or customer of the financial institution that the financial institution has provided information or taken any action pursuant to KRS 205.715 to 205.800 or the agreement and shall not be liable for failure to provide that notice; provided however, that a financial institution may disclose to its depositors or account holders that, under the data match system, the cabinet has the authority to request certain identifying information on certain depositors or account holders. The cabinet shall notify, not less than annually, affected depositors or account holders who have not otherwise received notification.

A financial institution may charge an account levied on by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services a fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20) which may be deducted from the account prior to remitting any funds to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 47, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 270, effective June 20, 2005.

205.778.
Lien against account of parent owing child support — Notice — Account activity fees — Priority of lien.

When the cabinet determines that the name, record address, and either Social Security number or taxpayer identification number of an account with a financial institution matches the name, record address, and either the Social Security number or taxpayer identification number of a parent who owes past-due support in an amount equal to or greater than one (1) month’s obligation, a lien or levy shall, subject to the provision of subsection (3) of this section, arise against the assets in the account at the time of receipt of the notice by the financial institution at which the account is maintained. The cabinet shall provide a notice of the match, the lien or levy arising therefrom, and the action to be taken to surrender or encumber the account with the lien or levy for child support payment to the individual identified and the financial institution holding the account. The financial institution shall have no obligation to hold, encumber, or surrender assets in any account based on a match until receipt of the notice from the cabinet.

The cabinet shall provide notice to the individual subject to a child support lien or levy on assets in an account held by a financial institution within two (2) business days of the date that notice is sent to the financial institution.

A financial institution ordered to surrender or encumber an account shall be entitled to collect its normally scheduled account activity fees to maintain the account during the period of time the account is seized or encumbered.

Any levy issued on an identified account by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for past-due child support shall have first priority over any other lien or levy issued by the Department of Revenue or any other agency, corporation, or association.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 48, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 623, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 271, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 158, § 31, effective July 12, 2012.

205.7785.
Interstate lien to enforce Kentucky child support obligation — Lien to enforce obligation credited in another state — Priority of out-of-state lien — Certification of authority.

An interstate lien may be created and a notice of interstate lien may be filed on all of an obligor’s real and personal property that is located in another state to enforce a child support obligation which has been judicially or administratively established in the Commonwealth. The lien shall be filed in the appropriate offices of the state or county where the property of the obligor is located. All aspects of the lien, including its priority and enforcement, are governed by the law of the state where the property is located and shall remain until released by the authorized agent of the party which filed the lien, or in accordance with the laws of the state of filing.

A lien to enforce a child support obligation which is created in another state shall be enforceable against all real and personal property of the obligor located in this state upon the filing of a notice of interstate lien with the county clerk of any county or counties in which the obligor has interest in property, and the notice shall be recorded in the same manner as notices of lis pendens. The recordation shall constitute notice of both the original amount of child support due and all subsequent amounts due by the same obligor. Upon request, an authorized agent of the party which filed the notice of interstate lien shall disclose the specific amount of liability to any interested party legally entitled to that information. The notice, when so filed, shall be conclusive notice to all persons of the lien on the property having legal situs in that county. The lien shall commence as to property of the obligor located in the Commonwealth at the time the notice is filed and shall continue until the original amount of child support due and any subsequent amounts, including interest, penalties, or fees, are fully paid. The lien shall attach to all interest in the real and personal property in the Commonwealth, then owned or subsequently acquired by the obligor. The clerk shall be entitled to a fee pursuant to KRS 64.012 for filing the lien and the same fee for releasing the lien.

A child support lien created in another state shall be on a parity with state, county, and municipal ad valorem tax liens, and superior to the lien of any mortgage or other encumbrance created after the notice of interstate lien is recorded; however, it shall be subordinate to any child support lien which has been filed by the cabinet as to the same obligor and property.

The authority by which the child support lien is created in another state and filed in this state shall be certified on the notice of interstate lien by a person who is authorized to certify on behalf of the party that is filing the notice of interstate lien.

The secretary of the cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 49, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 255, § 19, effective January 1, 2007.

205.780.
Legal action for reimbursement.

At any time prior to a child’s twenty-first birthday, the cabinet may institute a legal action against an obligor for the reimbursement of money paid by the cabinet for the benefit of the child through the public assistance programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 16; 1988, ch. 411, § 14, effective July 15, 1988.

205.782.
Service of process by constable in county containing city of the first class.

In a county containing a city of the first class, the provisions of KRS 454.140 notwithstanding, including those provisions related to priority of other officers, all forms of legal process may be served in any child support action by a constable of the county upon direction by the initiating party. A constable shall not be automatically deemed an interested party in litigation merely by virtue of serving process on behalf of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 411, § 33, effective July 15, 1988.

205.785.
Identity of parent — Information concealment.

It shall be unlawful for anyone to knowingly refuse to give the secretary the name of a parent of a child for whom services are being provided under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act or information which will assist the secretary in locating a parent of a child.

Any information gathered pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not be used in criminal prosecutions against the informant.

It shall be unlawful for anyone to knowingly give the secretary the incorrect name of a parent of a child or to knowingly give the secretary incorrect information on the parent’s whereabouts when it is done for the purpose of concealing the identity of the real parent of the child or when it is done with the intent of concealing the location of the parent.

Failure to provide information as required in subsection (1) of this section or providing incorrect information as prohibited in subsection (3) of this section shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 17; 1978, ch. 277, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 411, § 15, effective July 15, 1988.

205.790.
Procedures — Actions — Remedies.

The procedures, actions and remedies provided for in KRS 205.710 to 205.800, 403.215, 405.405 to 405.530, and 530.050 shall be in addition to and not in substitution of other proceedings provided by law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 18; 1988, ch. 411, § 16, effective July 15, 1988.

205.792.
Use of administrative process to determine and enforce support obligations.

In addition to the procedures for judicial determination, and enforcement of support obligations described in KRS 205.710 through 205.800, the cabinet may employ administrative process, as described in KRS 405.405 to 405.520, to determine and enforce support obligations when paternity is not in question.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 144, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 330, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2012, ch. 158, § 32, effective July 12, 2012.

205.793.
Administrative subpoena for information relating to child support — Financial institution may deduct funds from account — Action to enforce subpoena.

The cabinet shall have authority to issue an administrative subpoena commanding information and records relating to the establishment, enforcement, and collection of child support.

All public and private entities including financial institutions shall comply with a subpoena issued under this section within a reasonable time period. Financial institutions may deduct twenty dollars ($20) from the account on which the subpoenaed information has been issued.

The cabinet may enforce compliance by filing an action in the Franklin Circuit Court.

The subpoena shall be issued by a person designated by the secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 39, effective July 15, 1998.

205.795.
Regulations.

The secretary may adopt regulations necessary to prevent conflict with federal laws and regulations or the loss of federal funds. The secretary may adopt regulations to establish procedures necessary to guarantee due process of law. These regulations shall be consistent with the purpose and intent of KRS 205.710 to 205.800.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 19.

205.796.
Divulging of information by employees or agents of the Commonwealth — Penalties for unauthorized disclosure.

No employee or agent of the Commonwealth shall divulge any information referred to in KRS 205.715 to 205.800, except in the manner prescribed in KRS 205.715 to 205.800 to any public or private agency or individual; provided, however, that information may be disclosed and shared by and between any employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and any designee, local administering agency, or any local housing authority for the purpose of verifying eligibility and detecting and preventing fraud, error, and abuse in the programs included in the reporting system. Unauthorized disclosure of any information shall be a violation that is punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) per offense; except that the unauthorized release of the information about any individual shall be a separate offense from information released about any other individual.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 45, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 272, effective June 20, 2005.

205.7965.
Release of data to government agencies.

Nothing in KRS 205.715 to 205.800 shall be construed to prevent the release by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of wage and financial institution information data to the United States Social Security Administration or the agencies of other states who administer federally funded welfare and unemployment compensation programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 46, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 273, effective June 20, 2005.

205.798.
Cabinet may coordinate with other agencies.

The cabinet may coordinate with other state agencies and cabinets to develop a system for the effective and efficient collection of child support payments.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 44, effective July 15, 1998.

205.800.
Referral to local officials — Cooperative arrangements for administering.

Where establishment of paternity and enforcement and collection of child support is by law the responsibility of local officials, the cabinet shall refer cases to the appropriate official for such. The cabinet may enter into cooperative arrangements with appropriate courts and law enforcement officials to assist the cabinet in administering the program of child support recovery, including the entering into of financial arrangements with such courts and officials as provided for under the provisions of federal law and regulations and any other matters of common concern to such courts or officials and the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 20; 1978, ch. 277, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.

205.802.
Standardized forms for entry into state case registry.

All forms, child support orders, wage withholding orders, or orders amending an existing child support order, entered in any case in Circuit, District, or Family Court that require entry into the state case registry pursuant to KRS 205.712(4) shall be entered on forms adopted by the Administrative Office of the Courts in coordination with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. If the provisions of a child support order are contained in an order that is narrative in nature, the adopted forms shall be used in addition to the narrative order.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 274, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 112, § 14, effective July 14, 2018.